Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 4. Alaska Affordable Heating Program.

Cross references. —

For Alaska Renewable Energy Task Force, in existence through April 15, 2010, see § 7, ch. 31, SLA 2008.

Effective dates. —

Section 12, ch. 31, SLA 2008, makes this article effective May 23, 2008, in accordance with AS

01.10.070(c)

.

Editor’s notes. —

Concerning the amendments to
AS

47.25.621

—

47.25.626

by
ch. 83, SLA 2010, § 44(a),
ch. 83, SLA 2010, provides
—
To the extent consistent with [the 2010 amendments of these sections,] regulations of the Department of Health and Social Services adopted under the authority of
AS

47.25.622

that are in effect on September 14, 2010, remain in effect until the department adopts regulations consistent with [the 2010 amendments of these sections].”

Sec. 47.25.621.
Alaska affordable heating program.

The Alaska affordable heating program is established in the Department of Health and Social Services to provide expanded eligibility for Alaska residents for home heating assistance, to the extent funds are available in the Alaska affordable heating fund.

The Alaska affordable heating program established under this section is in addition to the federal low-income heating and energy assistance provided under 42 U.S.C. 8621 — 8629 (Low-Income Home Energy Assistance Act of 1981), as amended, and implementing regulations.

The Alaska affordable heating fund is established as a separate fund to be managed by the Department of Revenue. The fund consists of appropriations made to it. Interest earned by the fund may be appropriated to it. The Department of Health and Social Services shall use money in the fund for Alaska affordable heating payments.

History.

(§ 4 ch 31 SLA 2008; am §§ 29, 30 ch 83 SLA 2010)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective September 14, 2010, in the section heading and in the section, substituted “Alaska affordable heating program” for “Alaska heating assistance program”; in (a), substituted “available in the Alaska affordable heating fund” for “appropriated by the legislature for that purpose”; added (c).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 11, ch. 31, SLA 2008, made this section retroactive to November 1, 2007, but §§ 9 and 12, ch. 2, 4SSLA 2008 repeal § 11, ch. 31, SLA 2008, effective August 26, 2008.

Sec. 47.25.622.
Duties.

The Department of Health and Social Services shall

administer the Alaska affordable heating program provided under AS

47.25.621

;

adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) to carry out the purpose of the program;

coordinate payments among other heating assistance programs to avoid duplication of payments.

History.

(§ 4 ch 31 SLA 2008; am § 31 ch 83 SLA 2010)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective September 14, 2010, in the introductory language, substituted “Department of Health and Social Services” for “department”; in (1), substituted “Alaska affordable heating program” for “Alaska heating assistance program”.

Sec. 47.25.623.
Eligibility; payment amount.

An individual is eligible for home heating assistance payments under the Alaska affordable heating program if the individual

is a resident of the state;

is physically present and resides in a home in the state when the home heating costs are incurred;

for assistance calculated under (b) and (c) of this section, has gross household income not to exceed, as a percentage of the federal poverty guideline for Alaska set by the United States Department of Health and Human Services and revised under 42 U.S.C. 9902(2),

225 percent for a determination to be made under (c)(1) — (3) of this section; and

250 percent for a determination to be made under (c)(4) of this section; and

meets other eligibility requirements specified in regulations adopted under AS

47.25.622

.

The Department of Health and Social Services shall determine the number of points for each eligible individual based on the point formula used under 42 U.S.C. 8621 — 8629 (Low-Income Home Energy Assistance Act of 1981), as amended, and implementing regulations. Except as provided in (d) of this section, the amount of the Alaska affordable heating payment for an individual equals the base amount calculated under (c) of this section minus the amount the individual is eligible to receive under the federal low-income home energy assistance program under 42 U.S.C. 8621 — 8629, as amended, and implementing regulations.

The Department of Health and Social Services shall calculate the base amount of the Alaska affordable heating payment for the individual based on points determined under (b) of this section and on the average price a barrel of Alaska North Slope crude oil for sale on the United States West Coast during September through February of the preceding fiscal year as follows:

$130 a point when the average price is not more than $75 a barrel;

$140 a point when the average price is more than $75 and not more than $100 a barrel;

$150 a point when the average price is more than $100 and not more than $150 a barrel;

$165 a point when the average price is more than $150 a barrel.

Under the program authorized by AS

47.25.621

—

47.25.626

, taking into consideration the gross household income rates established in (a) of this section and the base amounts to be calculated under (b) and (c) of this section,

if insufficient money is appropriated to fully fund the Alaska affordable heating payments during the fiscal year, the department

shall, for the duration of that fiscal year, suspend calculation and payment under (a)(3)(B) of this section and calculate and pay all eligible individuals under (a)(3)(A) of this section; and

may, to the extent there is or may be an appropriation balance surplus to the amount required to make all payments under (A) of this paragraph, by regulation, establish at any time during the fiscal year a prospective pro rata reduction of the payment rates that the department will pay to eligible individuals under the program during that fiscal year qualifying under (a)(3)(B) of this section and, thereafter, may provide for prorated payments; and

if the commissioner reasonably determines that the total of appropriations from all sources during the fiscal year may exceed the amount required to fully fund all applications for assistance for Alaska affordable heating payments, the commissioner may expend the amount of excess money, not to exceed the total amount of the appropriations, to carry out the purpose of AS

47.25.621

—

47.25.626

; under the authority of this paragraph, the commissioner shall distribute the estimated excess money pro rata among individuals receiving assistance under this section without regard to the limitations set out in the dollar value of the point formula expressed in (c)(1) — (4) of this section.

History.

(§ 4 ch 31 SLA 2008; am §§ 32, 33 ch 83 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2008, “home” was deleted from the phrase “Alaska home heating assistance program” to correct a manifest error in ch. 31, SLA 2008.

Cross references. —

For federal poverty guidelines, see https://aspe.hhs.gov/poverty-guidelines.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective September 14, 2010, in the section heading, added “; payment amount”; in the introductory language, substituted “Alaska affordable heating program” for “Alaska heating assistance program”; substituted (a)(3), (a)(3)(A) and (a)(3)(B) for “has gross household income above 150 percent but that does not exceed 225 percent of the federal poverty guideline for Alaska set by the United States Department of Health and Human Services and revised under 42 U.S.C. 9902(2);”; added (b), (c), and (d).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 11, ch. 31, SLA 2008, made this section retroactive to November 1, 2007, but §§ 9 and 12, ch. 2, 4SSLA 2008 repeal § 11, ch. 31, SLA 2008, effective August 26, 2008.

Sec. 47.25.624.
Appeal rights.

Except as provided in AS

47.25.626(e)

, an individual who receives a determination from the department that denies, limits, or modifies home heating payments under AS

47.25.621

—

47.25.626

, other than a determination based on insufficient funding of the program, may request a hearing before the office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

) under regulations adopted by the department.

History.

(§ 4 ch 31 SLA 2008; am E.O. No. 116, § 10 (2012))

Cross references. —

For transition provisions for pending proceedings, rights, liabilities, or obligations under this section in effect on July 1, 2012, and regulations implementing this section in effect on July 1, 2012, see § 16, E.O. No. 116, in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, substituted “office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

)” for “department” following “may request a hearing before the”.

Sec. 47.25.625.
Ability to recover or recoup improper home heating assistance payments.

An individual is liable to the department for the value of assistance improperly paid under AS

47.25.623

if the improper payment was based on inaccurate or incomplete information provided by the individual. In a civil action brought by the state to recover from the individual the value of the assistance improperly paid, the state may recover from the individual the costs of investigation and prosecution of the civil action, including attorney fees as determined under court rules.

History.

(§ 4 ch 31 SLA 2008)

Sec. 47.25.626.
Regional heating assistance program.

The Department of Health and Social Services may develop a regional Alaska heating program for the administration of AS

47.25.621

—

47.25.626

to provide home heating assistance in a uniform and cost-effective manner in a region of this state if an Alaska Native organization is authorized to implement a federally approved tribal family assistance plan that includes that region and has been awarded a tribal energy assistance grant for a program that includes that region under 42 U.S.C. 8623(d).

The department may award contracts to implement a program developed under (a) of this section. A contract authorized for delivery of home heating assistance under a regional Alaska heating program under this section is exempt from the competitive bid requirements of AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code). Subject to appropriation, a contract under this section must be in an amount that represents a fair and equitable share of the money appropriated for the Alaska affordable heating program under AS

47.25.621

—

47.25.626

to serve the state residents specified in (a) of this section. The authority provided under this section to contract is in addition to the authority to contract in AS

47.05.015

or other law.

The department may award a contract under this section only to an organization that

has been awarded a tribal energy assistance grant under 42 U.S.C. 8623(d) for a program that includes that region;

agrees to administer home heating assistance under AS

47.25.621

—

47.25.626

to state residents in the region; and

agrees to implement an appeals process as described in (e) of this section.

Records pertaining to recipients of home heating assistance under a contract awarded under this section are confidential and not subject to disclosure under AS

40.25.100

—

40.25.220

.

An organization that receives a contract under this section shall provide an appeals process to applicants for or recipients of home heating assistance covered by the contract awarded under this section. The appeals process must be the same as the method available under AS

47.25.624

, except that the decision reached shall be considered a recommended decision to the department. Within 30 days after receiving a recommended decision, the department shall review the recommended decision and issue a decision accepting or rejecting the recommended decision. If the department rejects the recommended decision, the department shall independently review the record and issue its final decision. The final decision of the department on the matter is appealable to the courts of this state.

If the department establishes a regional Alaska heating program and awards a contract to provide home heating assistance under this section,

a person applying for home heating assistance under AS

47.25.621

—

47.25.626

in the region of the state covered by the regional Alaska heating program may obtain home heating assistance from the department only through the organization designated by the department to serve the region;

the department may require the contractor

to operate and administer the contract in a manner consistent with the organization’s federally approved energy assistance grant and plan; or

to apply the provisions of AS

47.25.623

to determine eligibility for home heating assistance to a person for whom assistance may be paid under the contract or may allow the contractor to use other criteria to determine that eligibility.

History.

(§ 4 ch 31 SLA 2008; am §§ 34 — 36 ch 83 SLA 2010)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective September 14, 2010, in (a), substituted “Department of Health and Social Services” for “department”, deleted “assistance” following “Alaska heating”; in (b), deleted “assistance” following “regional Alaska heating” and substituted “Alaska affordable heating program” for “Alaska heating assistance program”; in (f), in the introductory language and in (1), deleted “assistance” following “regional Alaska heating”, added the (1) and (2) designations, added (2).